Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB762.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 201 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 201. Definitions.--The following words, terms and phrases when used in this Article II shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * * 123456789101112131415161718192021 (vvv) "Volunteer EMS company." Any nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth, which is licensed by the Department of Health and is not associated or affiliated with any hospital, unless recognized in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. § 7823 (relating to award of grants), and which is regularly engaged in the provision of emergency medical services, including basic life support or advanced life support services and advanced life support squads as defined in 28 Pa. Code § 1027.1 (relating to general provisions). The term does not include any corporation, association or organization that is primarily engaged in the operation of invalid coaches which are intended for the routine transport of persons who are convalescent or otherwise nonambulatory and do not ordinarily require emergency medical treatment while in transit.(www) "Volunteer fire company." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth which provides fire protection or rescue services and which may offer other voluntary emergency services within this Commonwealth. Voluntary emergency services provided by a volunteer fire company may include voluntary ambulance and voluntary rescue services.(xxx) "Volunteer rescue company." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth that provides rescue services as part of the response to fires or vehicle accidents within this Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 204 of the act is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:20250HB0762PN0786 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(77) The sale at retail or use of protective equipment by members of a volunteer EMS company, volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company. For the purposes of this clause, the term "protective equipment" shall mean any equipment used by volunteer firefighters, volunteer ambulance service personnel or volunteer rescue service personnel to protect their person from injury while performing their functions, including helmets, turnout coats and pants, boots, eyeshields, gloves and self-contained respiratory protection units.Section 3. The addition of section 204(77) of the act shall apply to sales at retail or uses on or after July 1, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0762PN0786 - 3 - 12345678910111213